New York, session 2025-2026, A851.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2336 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (i) to read as follows: 3 (i) Any schedule of rates or rating plan for motor vehicle liability, 4 comprehensive, collision and personal injury protection coverages 5 submitted to the superintendent shall provide for an appropriate 6 reduction in premium charges for any insured for a period of two years 7 after successfully completing a fraud prevention course, known as the 8 New York auto fraud prevention program. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first day of January next 10 succeeding the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply 11 to all policies issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on or 12 after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03298-01-5